Utah statutes.
34A-2-408.   Compensation -- None for first three days after injury unless
disability extended.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (1)(b) and (2), compensation may
not be allowed for the first three days after the injury is received.
(b)  The disbursements authorized in this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act, for medical, nurse and hospital services, and for
medicines and funeral expenses are payable for the first three days after the
injury is received.
(2)  If the period of total temporary disability lasts more than 14 days,
compensation shall also be payable for the first three days after the injury
is received.
